oldTurkic.xfst
# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ɯ | æ ];
define BackV [ a | o | u | ɯ ];
define C [ l | t | m | s | ʃ | g | k | r ];
define eC1 [ g ];
define eC2 [ l ];

read lexc protoTurkic.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Lenite palatal fricative
define LeniteJ ʝ -> j ;

# l → ʃ after vowels
define Sigmatism l -> ʃ || V _ [ V | .#. ] ;

# d lenition
define dLenition d -> ð || V _ V ;

# g deletion
define gDeletion g -> 0 || C _ .#. ;

# vowel swapping
define aMarching1 [..] -> a || i _ C C a ;

# s to ɕ
define sTosch s -> ɕ || _ i ;

# Final a deletion
define aDeletion a -> 0 || C C _ .#. ;

# ia to ā 1
define iaToa1 a -> ā || i _ ;

# ia to ā 2
define iaToa2 i -> 0 || _ ā ;

# break coda clusters
define CCtoCuC [..] -> u|| [ o | u ] C _ C ;
define CCtoCyC [..] -> y|| [ œ | y ] C _ C ;
define CCtoCɯC [..] -> ɯ|| [ ā | a | ɯ ] C _ C ;
define CCtoCiC [..] -> i|| [ e | i ] C _ C ;

# g&q backing
define gBacking g -> ʁ|| BackV _ ;
define qBacking k -> q|| BackV _ ;
define qBacking2 k -> q|| _ BackV ;

# s voicing
define sVoicing s -> z || V _ [ V | .#. ] ;


# Convert to Turkic orthography
define TurkicV0 y -> ü ;
define TurkicV1 œ -> ö ;
define TurkicV2 æ -> ä ;
define TurkicV3 ɯ -> ı ;

define TurkicC0 ʁ -> ğ ;
define TurkicC1 ʃ -> ş ;
define TurkicC2 j -> y ;
define TurkicC1 ɕ -> ś ;



# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


define Grammar Lexicon .o.
					LeniteJ .o.
					dLenition .o.
               Sigmatism .o.
					gDeletion .o.
					aMarching1 .o.
					sTosch .o.
					aDeletion .o.
					iaToa1 .o. iaToa2 .o.
               CCtoCuC .o. CCtoCyC .o. CCtoCɯC .o. CCtoCiC .o.
               gBacking .o. qBacking .o. qBacking2 .o.
               sVoicing .o.
               TurkicV0 .o. TurkicV1 .o. TurkicV2 .o. TurkicV3 .o.
               TurkicC0 .o. TurkicC1 .o. TurkicC2 .o.
               Cleanup ;

regex Grammar ;


save stack oldTurkic.hfst
